bg-BG: Дизайн на водопроводен сифон: Звънец; Бутилка; Барабан; Уловител на мазнини; HepvO; P-уловител; Течащ; S-уловител; Други
hu: Lefolyó kialakítása: Harang; Palack; Hordó; Zsírfogó; HepvO; P-csapda; Lefolyó; S-csapda; Egyéb
el: Σχεδιασμός σιφονιού υδραυλικών εγκαταστάσεων: Κωδωνοειδές; Μπουκάλι; Τάμπουρο; Λιποδιαχωριστής; HepvO; Σιφόνι P; Τρέξιμο; Σιφόνι S; Άλλο
da: VVS-fældedesign: Klokke; Flaske; Tromme; Fedtopfanger; HepvO; P-lås; Løb; S-lås; Andet
ro-RO: Design sifon pentru instalații sanitare: Clopot; Butelie; Tambur; Interceptare grăsimi; HepvO; Sifon tip P; Anti-refulare gaze; Sifon tip S; Altele
pt-PT: Design de sifão: Sino; Garrafa; Tambor; Intercetador de massa lubrificante; HepvO; Sifão em P; Corrida; Sifão em S; Outro
zh-CN: 管道存水弯设计: 铃声; 酒瓶; 鼓; 油脂拦截器; HepvO; P 型存水弯; 跑步; S 型存水弯; 其他
tr: Sıhhi tesisat tuzak tasarımı: Zil; Şişe; Davul; Yağ tutucu; HepvO; P tuzak; Koşu; S tuzak; Diğer
nb: Design av avløpsfeller: Bjelle; Flaske; Tromme; Fettoppfanger; HepvO; P-lås; Løping; S-lås; Annet
zh-TW: 管線存水彎設計: 鐘聲; 瓶子; 鼓; 油脂攔截器; HepvO; P 型存水彎; 跑步; S 型存水彎; 其他
fi: Putkiston vesilukon muotoilu: Kello; Pullo; Rumpu; Rasvanerotin; HepvO-hajulukko; P-loukku; Lenkkeily; S-loukku; Muu
sv: Vattenlåskonstruktion: Klocka; Flaska; Trumma; Fettavskiljare; HepvO; P-fälla; Löpning; S-fälla; Övrigt
de: Design des Geruchsverschlusses: Glocke; Flasche; Trommel; Fettabscheider; HepvO; P-Siphon; Laufen; S-Siphon; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Konštrukcia vodovodného sifónu: Zvon; Fľaša; Bubon; Lapač tuku; HepvO; P-pasca; Beh; S-pasca; Iné
pl: Konstrukcja syfonu sanitarnego: Dzwon; Butelka; Bęben; Zbieracz tłuszczu; HepvO; Syfon typu P; Praca; Syfon typu S; Inne
en: Plumbing trap design: Bell; Bottle; Drum; Grease interceptor; HepvO; P-trap; Running; S-trap; Other
th: การออกแบบท่อดักน้ำเสีย: กระดิ่ง; ขวด; กลอง; บ่อดักไขมัน; วาล์ว HepvO; ท่อดักจับรูปตัว P; การวิ่ง; ท่อดักจับรูปตัว S; อื่นๆ
cs: Konstrukce vodovodního sifonu: Zvonek; Láhev; Buben; Lapač tuku; HepvO; Sifon typu P; Běhání; Sifon typu S; Jiné
lt-LT: Sifono dizainas: Varpelio formos; Buteliukas; Statinė; Riebalų gaudyklė; HepvO; P formos sifonas; Bėgantis; S formos sifonas; Kita
ru: Конструкция гидрозатвора: Колокол; Бутылка; Бочка; Жироуловитель; HepvO; P-образный сифон; Проточный; S-образный сифон; Другой
fr: Conception du siphon de plomberie: Cloche; Bouteille; Tambour; Intercepteur de graisse; HepvO; Siphon en P; Course; Siphon en S; Autre
it: Design del sifone: Campana; Bottiglia; Tamburo; Intercettatore di grasso; HepvO; Sifone a P; Corsa a piedi; Sifone a S; Altro
es: Diseño de la trampa de fontanería: Campana; Botella; Tambor; Interceptor de grasa; HepvO; Trampa P; Correr; Trampa S; Otros
nl: Ontwerp sifon voor loodgieters: Klok; Fles; Drum; Vetafscheider; HepvO; P-sifon; Rennen; S-sifon; Andere
sl-SI: Zasnova sifonov: Talni; T-sifon, manjši; T-sifon, večji; Maščobnik; HepvO; P-sifon za vertikalno inštalacijo; P-sifon za horizontalno inštalacijo; S-sifon; Drugo
pt-BR: Formato do sifão de encanamento: Sino; Garrafa; Tambor; Interceptador de graxa; HepvO; Sifão em P; Para corrida; Sifão em S; Outro
vi: Thiết kế bẫy ống nước: Chuông; Chai; Trống; Thiết bị tách dầu mỡ; HepvO; P-trap; Chạy; S-trap; Khác
ja: 排水トラップの種類: ベル; ボトル; ドラム; グリースインターセプター; HepvO; Pトラップ; ランニング; Sトラップ; その他
hr-HR: Dizajn sifona za odvod: Zvono; Boca; Bubanj; Presretač masti; HepvO; P-sifon; Protočni; S-sifon; Ostalo
ko: 배수 트랩 디자인: 벨; 병; 드럼; 그리스 인터셉터; HepvO; P자 트랩; 달리기; S자 트랩; 기타